Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.005

Purpose.

The purpose of chapter 35.02 RCW is to provide a clear and uniform process for the incorporation of cities or towns operating under either Title 35 or 35A RCW. An incorporation may result in the creation of a second-class city or town operating under Title 35 RCW or a noncharter code city operating under Title 35A RCW.

[ 1994 c 81 s 6; 1986 c 234 s 1.]